tests/nouns-misc.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] Prevocalic consonant voicing": 
    kitap<n><nom> : kitap
    kitap<n><acc> : kitabı
    kitap<n><px3sp><nom> : kitabı
    tat<n><nom> : tat
    tat<n><acc> : tadı
    tat<n><px3sp><nom> : tadı

  "[twol] {A} harmony":
    kitap<n><pl><nom> : kitaplar
    ev<n><pl><nom> : evler
    saat<n><pl><nom> : saatler 
    kitap<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p3><pl> : kitaplar
    ev<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p3><pl> : evler
    saat<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p3><pl> : saatler 

  "[twol] {A} harmony in dative": 
    kitap<n><dat> : kitaba
    anne<n><dat> : anneye 
    ev<n><dat> : eve
    saat<n><dat> : saate

   "POSSESSIVES":

   ev<n><px1sg> : evim
   ev<n><px2sg> : evin
   ev<n><px3sg> : evi
   ev<n><px1pl> : evimiz
   ev<n><px2pl> : eviniz
   ev<n><px3pl> : evleri

   "f-f-f-f":
   
   festival<n><dat> : festivale
   festival<n><acc> : festivali
   
   "f-f-f-2":
   petrol<n><dat> : petrole
   petrol<n><acc> : petrolü   
 
 
   
   
